Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 15. Husband and Wife.

Collateral references. —

41 Am. Jur. 2d, Husband and Wife, § 1 et seq.

41 C.J.S., Husband and Wife, § 1 et seq.

Property rights arising from relationship of couple cohabiting without marriage, 3 ALR4th 13.

Modern status of rule that husband is primarily or solely liable for necessaries furnished wife in divorce, 20 ALR4th 196.

Validity and effect of one spouse’s conveyance to other spouse of interest in property held as estate by the entireties, 18 ALR5th 230.

Sec. 25.15.010.
Property of one spouse not subject to contracts or liabilities of other.

When property is owned by one spouse, the other has no interest that makes the property liable for the contracts or liabilities of the spouse who is not the owner of the property, except as provided in this chapter and AS 34.77.

History.

(§ 21-2-1 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference to “AS 34.77” was substituted for “AS 34.75” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of the chapter.

Sec. 25.15.020.
Actions between spouses respecting property.

Subject to AS 34.77, if one spouse obtains possession or control of property belonging to the other, either before or after marriage, the owner of the property may maintain an action for it, or for any right growing out of it, in the same manner and to the same extent as if they were unmarried.

History.

(§ 21-2-2 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 42 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference to “AS 34.77” was substituted for “AS 34.75” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of the chapter.

Sec. 25.15.030.
Validity of conveyance, transfer, or lien between spouses.

A conveyance, transfer, or lien executed by one spouse to or in favor of the other is valid to the same extent as between other persons.

History.

(§ 21-2-3 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 25.15.040.
Authority to act as attorney-in-fact for each other.

A husband or wife may appoint the other as attorney-in-fact to control or dispose of property, and may revoke the appointment to the same extent and manner as other persons.

History.

(§ 21-2-4 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 25.15.050.
Nonliability for premarital or separate debts of other.

Subject to AS 34.77, neither spouse is liable for the debts or liabilities of the other incurred before marriage, and, except as otherwise provided, neither is liable for the separate debts of the other, nor is the rent or income of the property of one spouse liable for the separate debts of the other.

History.

(§ 21-2-5 ACLA 1949; am § 4 ch 42 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference to “AS 34.77” was substituted for “AS 34.75” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of the chapter.

Sec. 25.15.060.
Control and liability of separate property of spouse.

Subject to AS 34.77, the property and pecuniary rights of a married person at the time of marriage or afterwards that are acquired by gift, devise, or inheritance are not subject to the debts or contracts of the other spouse, and a spouse may manage, sell, convey, or devise the property and pecuniary rights that by will are separate property of that spouse.

History.

(§ 21-2-6 ACLA 1949; am § 94 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 42 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference to “AS 34.77” was substituted for “AS 34.75” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of the chapter.

Sec. 25.15.070.
Property acquired during coverture by her own labor. [Repealed, § 95 ch 127 SLA 1974.]

Secs. 25.15.080, 25.15.090.
Husband’s return as affecting actions to which wife a party; liability for civil injuries committed by married woman. [Repealed, §§ 96, 97 ch 127 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 25.15.100.
Married person may contract or incur liabilities.

A married person may make contracts and may incur liabilities, and the contracts and liabilities may be enforced by or against the person to the same extent and in the same manner as if the person were unmarried.

History.

(§ 21-2-10 ACLA 1949; am § 98 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Sec. 25.15.110.
Laws imposing civil disabilities upon married persons repealed.

All laws that impose or recognize civil disabilities upon a married person that are not imposed or recognized as existing as to the other spouse are repealed.
For any unjust usurpation of property or natural rights a married person has the same right to appeal individually to all courts for redress that the other spouse has.

History.

(§ 21-2-11 ACLA 1949; am § 99 ch 127 SLA 1974)